Hawaii statutes.
§173A-2.4 Legacy land conservation
commission. (a) There is established within the department of land and
natural resources a legacy land conservation commission. The commission shall
consist of nine members, with at least one member from each of the counties,
who shall be appointed in the manner and serve for the term set forth in
section 26-34 as follows:

(1) Four of the members of the commission shall be
persons possessing scientific qualifications as evidenced by an academic degree
in wildlife or marine biology, botany, forestry, ecology, resource management,
biogeography, zoology, or geology;

(2) One member shall be a person possessing
membership in an environmental organization organized in the State;

(3) One member shall be a person possessing
membership in a land conservation organization organized in the State;

(4) One member shall be a person possessing
membership in a statewide agricultural association; and

(5) One member shall be a person knowledgeable about
native Hawaiian culture.

The chairperson of the natural area reserves system
commission, or the chairperson's designated representative from the natural
area reserves system commission, shall serve as an ex officio[,] voting
member. The members of the commission shall elect the chairperson of the
commission. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for
their services on the commission but shall be entitled to reimbursement for
necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of
their duties.

(b) Any action taken by the commission shall
be by a simple majority of its members. Five members of the commission shall
constitute a quorum.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in
this chapter, the commission shall be subject to sections 26-34, 26-35,
26-35.5, and 26-36.

(d) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to carry out its duties. [L 2006, c 254, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 82,
§2]

Attorney General Opinions

Cited, in determining that in the absence of other statutory
wording to the contrary, the holdover provision from §26-34(b) would apply to
board and commission statutes that refer to §26-34 and that the provision is
constitutional. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next